src/import/adjectives.lexc
@P.Stem.Nom@muutev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´uutE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@mõistev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´õistE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@mõskev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´õskE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@mõõtev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´õõtE2v MAGUS ;
mängitav+A:mängitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@möönev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m´öönE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@naasev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n´aasE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@naerev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n´aerE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@naitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n´aitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@needev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n´eedE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@niitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n´iitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nuttev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n´uttE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@nõudev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@n´õudE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@olev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@olev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ostev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´ostE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@paistev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´aistE2v MAGUS ;
pakutav+A:pakutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@peetav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´eetav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@peitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´eitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@peksev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´eksE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pesev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@pesev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pettev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´ettE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@pistev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´istE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@puskev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´uskE2v MAGUS ;
puudutav+A:puudutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@päästev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´äästE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@püüdev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p´üüdE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@reetev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r´eetE2v MAGUS ;
ristitav+A:ris,titav MAGUS ;
rõhutav+A:rõhutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@saatev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´aatE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@seadev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´eadE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@seisev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´eisE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@suutev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´uutE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sõitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´õitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sõudev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´õudE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@säästev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´äästE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@sööstev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´ööstE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@söötev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s´öötE2v MAGUS ;
sünnitav+A:sün,nitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tahtev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´ahtE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tappev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´appE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@teadev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´eadE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@toitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´oitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tootev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´ootE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tundev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´undE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tõstev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´õstE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@tõusev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´õusE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@täitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t´äitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@uhtev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´uhtE2v MAGUS ;
usutav+A:usutav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@uttev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´uttE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@veenev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´eenE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@veetev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´eetE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@vestev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´estE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@viitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´iitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@võidev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´õidE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@võitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´õitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@võttev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´õttE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@väitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v´äitE2v MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@õitsev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´õitsE2v MAGUS ;
õhetav+A:õhetav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@õhkuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´õhkuv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@õitsev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´õitsev MAGUS ;
õnnestav+A:õnnestav MAGUS ;
õpetatav+A:õpetatav MAGUS ;
õpetav+A:õpetav MAGUS ;
õpitav+A:õpitav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@õppiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´õppiv MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@õõtsuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´õõtsuv MAGUS ;
õõvastav+A:õõvastav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ähkiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´ähkiv MAGUS ;
ähvardav+A:ähvardav MAGUS ;
ängistav+A:ängistav MAGUS ;
äratav+A:äratav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ärev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@ärev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ärkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´ärkav MAGUS ;
ärritatav+A:ärritatav MAGUS ;
ärritav+A:ärritav MAGUS ;
ärrituv+A:ärrituv MAGUS ;
ühendav+A:ühendav MAGUS ;
ühinev+A:ühinev MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ühtiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´ühtiv MAGUS ;
üldistav+A:ül,distav MAGUS ;
ületav+A:ületav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ülev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@ülev MAGUS ;
üllatav+A:üllatav MAGUS ;
ümbritsev+A:ümbritsev MAGUS ;
üritav+A:üritav MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ütlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@´ütlev MAGUS ;
